Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 6

Health Care Referrals

63-6-601. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Entity” or “health care entity” means and includes a health care facility and an agency, company or health care professional, other than the referring physician, providing health care services;

“Health care facility” means and includes any real property or equipment of a health care institution as that term is defined in § 68-11-1602;

“Health care service” means and includes a diagnostic, treatment, therapy or rehabilitation service.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Brief Life of the Gag Clause: Why Anti-Gag Clause Legislation Isn't Enough, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1999).

Attorney General Opinions. A pharmacy falls within the definition of a “health care entity” as that term is defined in T.C.A. § 63-6-601. OAG 14-100, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/31/14).

63-6-602. Physician owned health care entities — Referrals prohibited — Exceptions.

Physician investment in health care can provide important benefits for patient care; however, when physicians refer patients to entities in which they have an ownership interest, a potential conflict of interest exists. A physician having an investment interest in a health care entity shall not refer patients to the entity unless:

The physician performs health care services at the entity; or

The investment interest satisfies the requirements set forth in § 63-6-603.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to physicians when a health care facility leases premises or equipment from an entity owning the premises or equipment, even if physicians have an ownership interest in the entity that leases the premises or equipment to the health care facility and refer patients to the health care facility, if:

There is a written lease agreement between the health care facility leasing the premises or equipment and the entity owning the premises or equipment;

The lease specifies the premises or equipment covered by the lease;

The term of the lease is for not less than one (1) year;

The aggregate rental charge is set in advance, is consistent with fair market value in arms-length transactions and is not determined in a manner that takes into account the volume or value of any referrals by physicians having an ownership interest in the entity leasing the premises or space to the health care facility; and

A physician having an ownership interest in the entity leasing the premises or space to the health care facility discloses that interest to any patient referred by the physician to the health care facility.

Subsection (a) shall not apply in the limited circumstances where the referring physician is referring physical therapy services and, in writing, the physician:

Discloses the physician's investment interest or financial relationship to patients when making a referral of the patient for physical therapy services;

Notifies patients that they may receive physical therapy services at the provider of their choice;

Informs patients that they have the option to use one (1) of the alternative providers; and

Assures patients that they will not be treated differently by the physician if they do not choose to use the physician-owned entity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, nothing in subdivision (c)(1) shall be construed to affect the ability of the commissioner of labor and workforce development to regulate, through the workers’ compensation comprehensive medical fee schedule and regulated system established by rules promulgated pursuant to § 50-6-204, all health care providers providing services to workers’ compensation patients.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, §§ 3, 11; 2006, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Physicians' conflict of interest disclosure, title 63, ch. 6, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. A pharmacy falls within the definition of a “health care entity” as that term is defined in T.C.A. § 63-6-601. OAG 14-100, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/31/14).

63-6-603. Where physicians may invest in and refer to an outside entity — Requirements.

There may be situations in which a needed entity would not be built or instituted if referring physicians were prohibited from investing in the entity and a need might exist when there is no entity of reasonable quality in the community or when use of existing entities is onerous for patients. Therefore, physicians may invest in and refer to an outside entity, whether or not they provide direct care or services at or for the entity, if there is a demonstrated need in the community for the entity and alternative financing is not available. In such cases, the following requirements apply:

Individuals who are not in a position to refer patients to the entity shall be given a bona fide opportunity to invest in the entity and be able to invest on the same terms that are offered to referring physicians. The terms on which investment interests are offered to physicians shall not be related to the past or expected volume of referrals or other business from the physicians;

There is no requirement that any physician investor make referrals to the entity or otherwise generate business as a condition for remaining an investor;

The entity shall not market or furnish its items or services to referring physician investors differently than to other investors;

The entity shall not loan funds or guarantee a loan for physicians in a position to refer to the entity;

The return on the physician's investment shall be tied to the physician's equity in the entity rather than to the volume of referrals;

Investment contracts shall not include noncompetition clauses that prevent physicians from investing in other entities;

Physicians shall disclose their investment interest to their patients when making a referral. Patients shall be given a list of effective alternative entities if any such entities become reasonably available, informed that they have the option to use one of the alternative entities and assured that they will not be treated differently by the physician if they do not choose the physician-owned entity. These disclosure requirements also apply to physician investors who directly provide care or services for their patients in entities outside their office practice;

The physician's ownership interest shall be disclosed, when requested, to third party payers;

An internal utilization review program is established to ensure that investing physicians do not exploit their patients in any way, such as by inappropriate or unnecessary utilization; and

When a physician's financial interest conflicts so greatly with the patient's interest as to be incompatible, the physician shall make alternative arrangements for the care of the patient.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, § 4.

Cross-References. Physicians' conflict of interest disclosure, title 63, ch. 6, part 5.

63-6-604. Prohibited cross referral arrangements.

Cross referral arrangements or schemes between physicians or between physicians and entities, in which the physician or physicians know or should know that the arrangement has as its principal purpose generating referrals to an entity that if made directly by one of the participating physicians would be in violation of this part, are prohibited.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, § 5.

63-6-605. Preexisting investments — Compliance.

If physicians have invested in entities prior to July 1, 1993, the physicians shall reevaluate their activity in accordance with this part and comply with its provisions. If compliance with the need and alternative investor criteria is not practical, it is essential that the identification of reasonably available alternative entities be provided.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, § 6.

63-6-606. Disposal of ownership interests — Cessation of referrals.

On and after July 1, 1995, all physicians are required either to:

Dispose of their ownership interests in entities outside their office practice at which they do not directly provide care or services when they have an investment interest in the entity unless the entity meets the requirements of § 63-6-602; or

Cease referring patients to such entities.

Physicians are encouraged to seek out potential buyers of a minority race before disposing of facilities or equipment regulated by this part. Upon request, the office of minority business enterprise in the department of economic and community development shall provide information relative to potential minority purchasers.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, §§ 7, 10.

63-6-607. Violations — Sanctions.

Any physician who makes or causes to be made a referral prohibited by this part is in violation of the medical practice law, as compiled in this chapter. Willful violations of this part are considered unprofessional conduct, which conduct is subject to licensure sanction by the board of medical examiners, including suspension, revocation or other restriction deemed appropriate by the board. In addition, the board is authorized to impose civil penalties of an amount up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each prohibited referral.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, § 8.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-6-608. Investment interests in publicly traded entities.

The definition of “investment interest” does not include a publicly traded entity in which such physician has an investment interest if all of the following requirements are met:

The entity's stock is listed for trading on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange or is a national market system security traded under an automated interdealer quotation system operated by the National Association of Securities Dealers;

The entity had, at the end of the corporation's most recent fiscal year, total assets of at least fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, related to the furnishing of health services;

The entity markets and furnishes its services to physician-investors and other physicians on the same and equal terms;

All stock of the entity, including the stock of any predecessor privately held company, is one (1) class without preferential treatment as to status or remuneration;

The entity does not issue loans or guarantee any loans for physicians who are in a position to refer patients to such entity if the physician uses any portion of the loan to obtain the investment interest;

The income on the physician's investment is not tied to referral volumes and is directly proportional to the physician's equity interest in the entity;

The physician's investment interest does not exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the entity's total equity; and

The physician purchases the investment interest either:

On terms generally available to the public; or

In exchange for an investment interest acquired by the physician before July 1, 1993; provided, the terms of the exchange are consistent with fair market value in an arms-length transaction and are not related to the volume or value of any referrals from the physician to the corporation and the investment interest is not held after December 31, 1997.

Acts 1993, ch. 408, § 9.